Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1677.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known as the “Veterinary Telemedicine for


Livestock Care Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 698.30c of Title 59, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:





Req. No. 3229 Page 1


1. “Livestock” means cattle, bison, swine, sheep, goats,


equine, and poultry raised for commercial, agricultural, or


subsistence purposes;


2. “Telemedicine” means the practice of veterinary medicine


using electronic communications, information technology, or other


means of interaction between a licensed veterinarian and a livestock


owner or caretaker when the veterinarian and the animal are not in


the same physical location; and


3. “Veterinarian-client-patient relationship” (VCPR) means the


relationship defined in Section 698.2 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma


Statutes and veterinary board rules, which may be established


through telemedicine under the conditions set forth in this act.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 698.30d of Title 59, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Telemedicine may be used by licensed veterinarians to


evaluate, diagnose, and provide personalized treatment


recommendations for livestock when an in-person examination is not


immediately feasible, provided that the:


1. Condition of the livestock requires timely veterinary


attention to prevent death, serious harm, or unnecessary suffering;


2. Use of telemedicine is limited to cases where visual or


verbal communication with the owner or caretaker provides sufficient


information for the veterinarian to make a professional judgment;

Req. No. 3229 Page 2


3. Veterinarian obtains sufficient information to make an


informed clinical decision through live videos, photographs,


electronic records, or other approved telecommunication methods; and


4. Telemedicine encounter is documented in the patient’s


medical record in the same manner as an in-person consultation.


B. Telemedicine shall not be used as a substitute for annual


herd health inspections, vaccinations, or other procedures requiring


physical presence, unless approved by the State Board of Veterinary


Medical Examiners.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 698.30e of Title 59, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners shall promulgate


rules and regulations establishing:


1. Standards for the appropriate use of telemedicine in


livestock care;


2. Requirements for recordkeeping and confidentiality of


telemedicine encounters;


3. Training for certification standards for veterinarians


utilizing telemedicine; and


4. Limitations on prescribing medications through telemedicine


without a veterinarian-client-patient relationship (VCPR) or an in-


person examination, except in emergency cases where immediate



Req. No. 3229 Page 3


treatment is necessary in order to preserve animal health and


welfare.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3229 YG 1/14/2026 9:55:09 AM

































Req. No. 3229 Page 4